District of Columbia statutes.
10-551.03

Director; appointment.

(a)

The Director shall manage and administer the Department and all functions and personnel assigned thereto, including the power to redelegate to other employees and officials of the Department powers and authority as in the judgment of the Director are warranted in the interests of efficiency and sound administration.

(b)

The Director shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council pursuant to § 1-523.01(a) and shall have extensive experience in construction project management or real property management.

History

Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 1024, 58 DCR 6226

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1004 of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).